Utah statutes.
54-8a-11.   Applicability of federal law.

The following persons or entities are subject to the provisions of Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 198, Regulations for Grants to Aid State Pipeline Safety Programs, including those provisions relating to damage to underground facilities:

(1)  an operator, to the extent subject to the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, 49 U.S.  Code 1671 et seq.  or the Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979, 49 App.  U.S.C.  2001 et seq.;

(2)  an excavator; and

(3)  a person who operates an association.

